Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.450

Island library districts—Dissolution, when.

If after an island library district serving a single island has been established, a rural county library district serving all of the area of the county not included within the area of incorporated cities and towns is established as provided in RCW 27.12.040, the district serving the single island in the county shall be dissolved.

[ 1982 c 123 s 7.]

NOTES:

Dissolution of library districts: RCW 27.12.320.